Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 40.
SCHOOL DISTRICT TAX (CONST., ART. 14, § 3, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 14, § 3, as amended, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed by Senate Joint Resolution (see Acts 1947, p. 1068) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on March 28, 1947. It was voted upon at the general election on Nov. 2, 1948, and adopted by a vote of 136,576 for and 82,557 against.

Ark. Const., Art. 14, § 3, as amended by Ark. Const. Amend 11 and Ark. Const. Amend. 40, was further amended by Ark. Const. Amend. 74. See notes to Ark. Const., Art. 14, § 3.